Windows-l10n-central/lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX h Y 123
SFX h  0   ies     [āēīoū]t   is:0xta0
SFX h  t   jies    [āēīoū]t   is:2vta0
SFX h  t   jas     [āēīoū]t   is:3vta0
SFX h  t   jamies  [āēīoū]t   is:1dta0
SFX h  t   jaties  [āēīoū]t   is:2dta0
SFX h  t   jieties [āēīoū]t   is:2dtap
SFX h  t   joties  [āēīoū]t   is:0xtaa
SFX h  t   jas/]|  [āēīoū]t   is:0xtav
SFX h  0    ies     [gkps]t   is:0xta0
SFX h  st   šos   [^aieu]st   is:1vta0
SFX h  t    ies  [^aienuū]st   is:2vta0
SFX h  st   ties    [nū]st      is:2vta0
SFX h  st   šas     [^aieu]st   is:3xta0
SFX h  st   šamies  [^aieu]st   is:1dta0
SFX h  st   šaties  [^aieu]st   is:2dta0
SFX h  st   šoties  [^aieu]st   is:0xtaa
SFX h  t    ieties  [^aienuū]st  is:2dtap
SFX h  st   tieties  [nū]st      is:2dtap
SFX h  st   šas/]|  [^aieu]st   is:0xtav
SFX h ast  odos     ast   is:1vta0
SFX h ast  odies    ast   is:2vta0
SFX h ast  odas     ast   is:3vta0
SFX h ast  odamies  ast   is:1dta0
SFX h ast  odaties  ast   is:2dta0
SFX h ast  odoties  ast   is:0xtaa
SFX h ast  odieties ast   is:2dtap
SFX h ast  odas/]|  ast   is:0xtav
SFX h  st   šos    [^m]est  is:1vta0
SFX h  st   ties   [^m]est  is:2vta0
SFX h  st   šas    [^m]est  is:3xta0
SFX h  st   šamies [^m]est  is:1dta0
SFX h  st   šaties [^m]est  is:2dta0
SFX h  st   šoties [^m]est  is:0xtaa
SFX h  t    ieties [^m]est  is:2dtap
SFX h  st   šas/]| [^m]est  is:0xtav
SFX h  st   tos     [m]est   is:1vta0
SFX h  st   ties    [m]est   is:2vta0
SFX h  st   tas     [m]est   is:3vta0
SFX h  st   tamies  [m]est   is:1dta0
SFX h  st   taties  [m]est   is:2dta0
SFX h  st   toties  [m]est   is:0xtaa
SFX h  st   tieties [m]est   is:2dtap
SFX h  st   tas/]|  [m]est   is:0xtav
SFX h  st   tos     [^mnr]ist   is:1vta0
SFX h  st   ties    [^mnr]ist   is:2vta0
SFX h  st   tas     [^mnr]ist   is:3vta0
SFX h  st   tamies  [^mnr]ist   is:1dta0
SFX h  st   taties  [^mnr]ist   is:2dta0
SFX h  st   toties  [^mnr]ist   is:0xtaa
SFX h  st   tieties [^mnr]ist   is:2dtap
SFX h  st   tas/]|  [^mnr]ist   is:0xtav
SFX h ist   ītos     [mnr]ist    is:1vta0
SFX h ist   īties    [mnr]ist    is:2vta0
SFX h ist   ītas     [mnr]ist    is:3xta0
SFX h ist   ītamies  [mnr]ist    is:1dta0
SFX h ist   ītaties  [mnr]ist    is:2dta0
SFX h ist   ītieties [mnr]ist    is:2dtap
SFX h ist   ītoties  [mnr]ist    is:0xtaa
SFX h ist   ītas/]|  [mnr]ist    is:0xtav
SFX h ikt   īkos     [i]kt   is:1vta0
SFX h ikt   īcies    [i]kt   is:2vta0
SFX h ikt   īkas     [i]kt   is:3xta0
SFX h ikt   īkamies  [i]kt   is:1dta0
SFX h ikt   īkaties  [i]kt   is:2dta0
SFX h t     šoties   [i]kt   is:0xtaa
SFX h ikt   īcieties [i]kt   is:2dtap
SFX h ikt   īkas/]|  [i]kt   is:0xtav
SFX h t  stos     [ru]kt   is:1vta0
SFX h t  sties    [ru]kt   is:2vta0
SFX h t  stas     [ru]kt   is:3xta0
SFX h t  stamies  [ru]kt   is:1dta0
SFX h t  staties  [ru]kt   is:2dta0
SFX h t  šoties   [ru]kt   is:0xtaa
SFX h t  stieties [ru]kt   is:2dtap
SFX h t  stas/]|  [ru]kt   is:0xtav
SFX h t  stos     gt   is:1vta0
SFX h t  sties    gt   is:2vta0
SFX h t  stas     gt   is:3xta0
SFX h t  stamies  gt   is:1dta0
SFX h t  staties  gt   is:2dta0
SFX h t  šoties   gt   is:0xtaa
SFX h t  stieties gt   is:2dtap
SFX h t  stas/]|  gt   is:0xtav
SFX h ust ūtos     [jsš]ust  is:1vta0
SFX h ust ūties    [jsš]ust  is:2vta0
SFX h ust ūtas     [jsš]ust  is:3xta0
SFX h ust ūtamies  [jsš]ust  is:1dta0
SFX h ust ūtaties  [jsš]ust  is:2dta0
SFX h ust ūtoties  [jsš]ust  is:0xtaa
SFX h ust ūtieties [jsš]ust  is:2dtap
SFX h ust ūtas/]|  [jsš]ust  is:0xtav
SFX h ust ūdos      [z]ust  is:1vta0
SFX h ust ūdies     [z]ust  is:2vta0
SFX h ust ūdas      [z]ust  is:3xta0
SFX h ust ūdamies   [z]ust  is:1dta0
SFX h ust ūdaties   [z]ust  is:2dta0
SFX h ust ūdoties   [z]ust  is:0xtaa
SFX h ust ūdieties  [z]ust  is:2dtap
SFX h ust ūdas/]|   [z]ust  is:0xtav
SFX h ust ūstos     [k]ust   is:1vta0
SFX h ust ūsties    [k]ust   is:2vta0
SFX h ust ūstas     [k]ust   is:3xta0
SFX h ust ūstamies  [k]ust   is:1dta0
SFX h ust ūstaties  [k]ust   is:2dta0
SFX h ust ūstieties [k]ust   is:2dtap
SFX h ust ūstoties  [k]ust   is:0xtaa
SFX h ust ūstas/]|  [k]ust   is:0xtav
SFX h st šos    [a]ust   is:1vta0
SFX h t  ies    [a]ust   is:2vta0
SFX h st šas    [a]ust   is:3xta0
SFX h st šamies [a]ust   is:1dta0
SFX h st šaties [a]ust   is:2dta0
SFX h  t ieties [a]ust   is:2dtap
SFX h st šoties [a]ust   is:0xtaa
SFX h st šas/]| [a]ust   is:0xtav
SFX h t  stos     [r]pt   is:1vta0
SFX h t  sties    [r]pt   is:2vta0
SFX h t  stas     [r]pt   is:3xta0
SFX h t  stamies  [r]pt   is:1dta0
SFX h t  staties  [r]pt   is:2dta0
SFX h t  stieties [r]pt   is:2dtap
SFX h t  stoties  [r]pt   is:0xtaa
SFX h t  stas/]|  [r]pt   is:0xtav

SFX ) Y 52
SFX ) t    ošies   [^begīklmprsūo]t
SFX ) ēbt  ebjošies  [ē]bt
SFX ) iet  ejošies  [^s]iet
SFX ) t    nošies    [s]iet
SFX ) gt   dzošies  [^ai]gt
SFX ) agt  ogošies    [a]gt
SFX ) gt   egošies  [mnrt]igt
SFX ) gt   dzošies [^mnrt]igt
SFX ) īt   enošies  [^rvm]īt
SFX ) īt   ijošies   [rvm]īt
SFX ) kt   cošies [^ailru]kt
SFX ) akt  okošies       akt
SFX ) ukt  ūkošies   [^a]ukt
SFX ) kt   cošies     [a]ukt
SFX ) ilkt elkošies   [i]lkt
SFX ) kt   cošies    [^i]lkt
SFX ) irkt ērkošies   [i]rkt
SFX ) kt   cošies    [^i]rkt
SFX ) kt   cošies  [^lnt]ikt
SFX ) kt   ekošies    [l]ikt
SFX ) ikt  īkošies   [nt]ikt
SFX ) lt   ļošies     lt
SFX ) t    jošies     mt
SFX ) pt   ošies  [^aiur]pt
SFX ) apt  opošies    [a]pt
SFX ) ipt  īpošies    [i]pt
SFX ) upt  ūpošies    [u]pt
SFX ) irpt ērpošies  [i]rpt
SFX ) ārt  arošies   [ā]rt
SFX ) ērt  erošies   [ē]rt
SFX ) irt  erdošies  [i]rt
SFX ) ast  otošies    [a]st
SFX ) st   došies  [^mi]est
SFX ) st   žošies    [i]est
SFX ) st   tošies    [m]est
SFX ) st   došies     [ē]st
SFX ) st   žošies   [īoū]st
SFX ) ist  ītošies [^aģķsr]ist
SFX ) st   žošies      [a]ist
SFX ) st   edošies     [ģ]ist
SFX ) st   etošies     [ķ]ist
SFX ) st   tošies      [s]ist
SFX ) ist  ītošies    [k]rist
SFX ) st   enošies    [b]rist
SFX ) irst ērtošies  [i]rst
SFX ) st   žošies    [ē]rst
SFX ) st   žošies  [^jkzsš]ust
SFX ) ust  ūtošies    [jsš]ust
SFX ) ust  ūstošies    [k]ust
SFX ) ust  ūdošies     [z]ust
SFX ) ūt   ujošies     ūt
SFX ) ot   odošies     ot

SFX ! Y 18
SFX ! t   ošies   [^āēīeouūbkmpsz]t
SFX ! t   jošies  [āēīouū]t
SFX ! t   nošies  [i]et
SFX ! t   ošies   [^ēi]kt
SFX ! ēkt ecošies  [ē]kt
SFX ! kt  ekošies  [i]kt
SFX ! zt  žošies    zt
SFX ! t   ošies   [^āeor]bt
SFX ! t   jošies   [āeor]bt
SFX ! t   ošies    [ņ]emt
SFX ! t   jošies   [^e]pt
SFX ! t   jošies  [^c]ept
SFX ! t   ošies    [c]ept
SFX ! st  šošies [^eiī]st
SFX ! st  šošies  [^n]est
SFX ! t   ošies    [n]est
SFX ! st  estošies  [i]st
SFX ! īst ienošies  [ī]st

SFX @ Y 14
SFX @ t    stošies [^āēīsz]t
SFX @ āt   ošies      āt
SFX @ ēt   ošies     [^c]ēt
SFX @ ēt   ošies   [^āe]cēt
SFX @ cēt  košies    [ā]cēt
SFX @ ēt   ošies   [^t]ecēt
SFX @ cēt  košies   [t]ecēt
SFX @ īt   ošies    [^cz]īt
SFX @ cīt  košies [^āīr]cīt
SFX @ īt   ošies   [āīr]cīt
SFX @ īt   ošies  [^atd]zīt
SFX @ dzīt gošies    [d]zīt
SFX @ t    stošies  [at]zīt
SFX @ 0    ošies     [sz]t

SFX + Y 2
SFX +   t    damies    t
SFX +   t    damās     t

SFX $ Y 2
SFX $   st   zdamies [s]t
SFX $   st   zdamās  [s]t

SFX J Y 3
SFX J  t   šana/Ss   [^sz]t
SFX J  st  šana/Ss   [s]t
SFX J  zt  šana/Ss   [z]t

SFX j Y 6
SFX j t  šanās [^sz]t  is:rldn
SFX j t  šanos [^sz]t  is:rlda
SFX j st šanās   [s]t  is:rldn
SFX j st šanos   [s]t  is:rlda
SFX j zt šanās   [z]t  is:rldn
SFX j zt šanos   [z]t  is:rlda
